Maryland, session 2025, SB0262.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Election Law
8–202.
(a) A principal political party, as determined by the statement of registration
issued by the State Board:
(1) shall use the primary election to:
(i) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 8–402 OF THIS TITLE, nominate its
candidates for public office; and
(ii) elect all members of the local central committees of the political
party; and
(2) may use the primary election in the year of a presidential election to
elect delegates to a national presidential nominating convention.
8–401.
(a) A special primary election [and] OR a special general election may be held at
a time other than the date of a regular primary election [and] OR a regular general election:
(1) to fill a vacancy in the office of Representative in Congress; or

SENATE BILL 262 3
(2) to fill a vacancy in the county council or in the office of chief executive
officer or county executive if the charter of that county provides for special elections.
(b) (1) Special elections to fill a vacancy in the office of Representative in
Congress shall be held at the time specified in Subtitle 7 of this title.
(2) (i) [Special] SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, SPECIAL elections to fill vacancies in a county council or in the office of chief
executive officer or county executive shall be held as provided in the county charter.
(ii) The date set for the special election to fill a vacancy under this
paragraph [shall]:
1. SHALL BE AT LEAST 90 DAYS AFTER THE ADOPTION OF
THE RESOLUTION OF THE COUNTY COUNCIL ESTABLISHING THE DATE OF THE
SPECIAL ELECTION;
2. MAY NOT BE WITHIN 120 DAYS OF BEFORE OR AFTER
A REGULARLY SCHEDULED ELECTION, BUT MAY BE CONCURRENT WITH A
REGULARLY SCHEDULED ELECTION; AND
3. SHALL allow at least 45 days between the date a local
board makes an absentee ballot available to an absent uniformed services voter or overseas
voter, as defined under the Uniformed and Overseas Citizens Absentee Voting Act, and the
date of the special election.
8–402.
(A) THE RESOLUTION OF A COUNTY COUNCIL ESTABLISHING THE DATE OF
A SPECIAL ELECTION TO FILL A VACANCY IN THE COUNTY COUNCIL OR IN THE
OFFICE OF CHIEF EXECUTIVE OFFICER OR COUNTY EXECUTIVE MAY DIRECT THAT:
(1) A SPECIAL PRIMARY ELECTION NOT BE HELD; AND
(2) THE VACANCY BE FILLED SOLELY THROUGH A SPECIAL GENERAL
ELECTION.
(B) IF THE COUNTY COUNCIL DIRECTS THAT A SPECIAL PRIMARY ELECTION
NOT BE HELD, THE RESOLUTION OF THE COUNTY COUNCIL ESTABLISHING THE DATE
OF THE SPECIAL ELECTION SHALL SPECIFY ONE OF THE FOLLOWING METHODS FOR
CONDUCTING THE SPECIAL GENERAL ELECTION:
(1) A PARTISAN ELECTION IN WHICH THERE ARE NO PARTY NOMINEES
BUT EACH FILED CANDIDATE APPEARS ON THE BALLOT WITH THE CANDIDATE’S
PARTY AFFILIATION, IF ANY; OR

SENATE BILL 262
(2) A NONPARTISAN ELECTION IN WHICH THERE ARE NO PARTY
NOMINEES AND EACH FILED CANDIDATE APPEARS ON THE BALLOT WITHOUT THE
CANDIDATE’S PARTY AFFILIATION.
8–403.
IF THE STATE ADMINISTRATOR DETERMINES THAT A CONFLICT EXISTS
BETWEEN A COUNTY CHARTER OR OTHER COUNTY LAW RELATING TO THE CONDUCT
OF A SPECIAL ELECTION AND THE PROVISIONS OF THIS ARTICLE OR THE CODE OF
MARYLAND REGULATIONS, THE STATE ADMINISTRATOR SHALL CONDUCT THE
SPECIAL ELECTION ENTIRELY IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS ARTICLE AND THE CODE
OF MARYLAND REGULATIONS.
9–502.
(a) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, a local board
shall mail by nonforwardable mail a vote–by–mail ballot to each registered voter who is
eligible to vote in a special election.
(2) A local board is not required to mail a vote–by–mail ballot to a voter if
the voter has requested that the ballot be sent by other means.
(3) A LOCAL BOARD IS NOT REQUIRED TO MAIL SPECIMEN BALLOTS
TO THE REGISTERED VOTERS OF THE COUNTY UNDER § 8–102 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(d) A local board shall send a vote–by–mail ballot to each eligible voter at least
[14] 30 days before the day of a special election.
9–504.
(a) A voter may return a vote–by–mail ballot to a local board:
(1) by mail;
(2) in person during regular office hours; [or]
(3) THROUGH A BALLOT DROP BOX; OR
(4) through a duly authorized agent in accordance with subsection (b) of
this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is an emergency
measure, is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public health or safety, has
been passed by a yea and nay vote supported by three–fifths of all the members elected to

SENATE BILL 262 5
each of the two Houses of the General Assembly, and shall take effect from the date it is
enacted.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.